Kentucky statutes. TITLE X Elections
Special Elections

118.710.
Proclamation
for special election of Governor.

Except as provided in KRS

120.205

,
when a vacancy happens in the office of Governor, requiring an election, a
proclamation therefor shall be issued by the Chief Justice of the Supreme
Court, or if he is absent from the state or unable to act, by one (1) of the
associate justices, and shall be directed to the sheriffs. The proclamation
shall be published by the sheriffs as required by KRS

118.750

.

History.

Enact. Acts 1974, ch. 130, § 147; 1976 (Ex. Sess.), ch. 14, § 132; 1986, ch. 470, § 33, effective July 15, 1986.

118.720.
Proclamation
for special election for Congressional representative.

When an election is to be held
to fill a vacancy in the office of representative in Congress, a proclamation
therefor, in lieu of a writ of election, shall be issued and signed by the
Governor and shall be directed to the proper sheriffs. The proclamation shall
be published by the sheriffs as required by KRS

118.750

.

History.

Enact. Acts 1974, ch. 130, § 148; 1986, ch. 470, § 34, effective July 15, 1986.

118.730.
Writ for special election for member of General Assembly — Location where voting to be conducted when only one candidate nominated — Exceptions.

When a vacancy exists in either house of the General Assembly during its session, the presiding officer of the house in which the vacancy exists shall issue a writ of election; when the General Assembly is not in session, the writ shall be issued by the Governor. The writ shall be signed by the officer issuing it, shall designate the day for holding the election, and shall be directed to the proper sheriff or sheriffs.

If a writ of election has been issued to fill a vacancy in either house of the General Assembly and only one (1) candidate has been nominated under KRS

118.760

and

118.770

and no candidate has filed a declaration of intent to be a write-in candidate for the vacancy under KRS 117.265(2), the county clerks of the counties in the territory in which the special election is to be held shall conduct voting in only one (1) of the following:

The county clerk’s office; or

Other place or places designated by the county board of elections and approved by the State Board of Elections.

Subsection (2) of this section shall not apply when the writ of election calls for the election to be held on either:

The day of a primary or general election; or

The same day as any other special election, except an uncontested special election to fill a vacancy in either house of the General Assembly.

History.

Enact. Acts 1974, ch. 130, § 149; 1984, ch. 208, § 1, effective July 13, 1984; 2012, ch. 8, § 2, effective March 28, 2012.

Legislative Research Commission Note.

(3/28/2012).
2012 Ky. Acts ch. 8, sec. 5, provides that the amendments to this statute in 2012 Ky. Acts ch. 8 shall be cited as “The Dewayne Bunch Act.”

118.740.
Delivery of proclamations and writs to sheriffs — Notice of election or special election.

A copy of a proclamation issued under KRS

118.710

or

118.720

, or a writ of election issued under KRS

63.200

,

118.730

,

120.205

, or

120.215

shall be forwarded by mail to the sheriff of each county in the district in which the election is to be held, at least fifty-six (56) days before the election. The sheriff of each county in which an election is to be held shall give notice at least forty-nine (49) days before the day of election. If, from any cause, the sheriff cannot properly act, he shall immediately hand the writ or proclamation to the person authorized to act in his place.

If a special election is administered under KRS 118.730(2), the notice required by subsection (1) of this section shall include the location of the election.

History.

Enact. Acts 1974, ch. 130, § 150; 1990, ch. 48, § 57, effective July 13, 1990; 2012, ch. 8, § 3, effective March 28, 2012; 2013, ch. 131, § 24, effective April 5, 2013; 2021 ch. 154, § 2, effective June 29, 2021; 2021 ch. 197, § 86, effective June 29, 2021.

Legislative Research Commission Notes.

(6/29/2021). This statute was amended by 2021 Ky. Acts chs. 154 and 197, which do not appear to be in conflict and have been codified together.

(3/28/2012).
2012 Ky. Acts ch. 8, sec. 5, provides that the amendments to this statute in 2012 Ky. Acts ch. 8 shall be cited as “The Dewayne Bunch Act.”

Opinions of Attorney General.

Where the time element involved was such that hand
delivery would be necessary to permit the election to be held in connection
with a short session, the courts would sustain it, provided the receipt of
the writ was properly receipted in writing by the sheriff so that there was
documented evidence that the writ had actually been received.

OAG 79-12

.

118.750.
Publication
of proclamations and writs by sheriffs.

Immediately on receipt of a
proclamation or writ of election, or other sufficient information thereof,
the sheriff shall give notice thereof by publication pursuant to KRS Chapter
424 and by handbills posted at the courthouse door and at the several places
of voting.

History.

Enact. Acts 1974, ch. 130, § 151.

Research References and Practice Aids

ALR

Special election, statutory provision as to manner
and time of notice of, as mandatory or directory. 119 A.L.R. 661.

Submission of special questions — validity of
public election as affected by fact that it was held at time other than fixed
by law. 121 A.L.R. 990.

Special election, validity of, as affected by publication
or dissemination of matter or information extrinsic to the question as submitted,
regarding nature or effect of the proposal. 122 A.L.R. 1142.

118.760.
Nominations of candidates for special elections.

Nominations by political parties, as defined in KRS

118.015

, to fill vacancies at special elections shall be made in the manner determined by the governing authority of the party in the territory in which the election is to be held. An independent, or political organization, or political group candidate may be nominated at a special election by a petition of electors qualified to vote for him or her. The independent, or political organization, or political group candidate shall not be a registered member of a political party prior to the filing of the petition as prescribed in KRS

118.770

. The form of the petition and the required number of signatures on the petition are set forth in KRS 118.315(2).

History.

Enact. Acts 1974, ch. 130, § 152; 1986, ch. 470, § 35, effective July 15, 1986; 2010, ch. 123, § 6, effective July 15, 2010.

118.770.
Time for filing petitions and certificates of nomination for special election of Governor, congressional representative or General Assembly member.

When a writ of election or proclamation is issued to fill a vacancy as prescribed in KRS

63.200

,

118.710

,

118.720

, or

118.730

, independent, or political organization, or political group petitions and certificates of nomination shall be filed at least forty-nine (49) days before the day of election, and if filed with the Secretary of State shall be immediately certified by him or her to the proper county clerks, except as may be provided under KRS

63.200

.

History.

Enact. Acts 1974, ch. 130, § 153; 1986, ch. 470, § 36, effective July 15, 1986; 1990, ch. 48, § 58, effective July 13, 1990; 2010, ch. 123, § 7, effective July 15, 2010; 2012, ch. 8, § 4, effective March 28, 2012; 2013, ch. 131, § 25, effective April 5, 2013; 2021 ch. 154, § 3, effective June 29, 2021.

Legislative Research Commission Notes.

(3/28/2012).
2012 Ky. Acts ch. 8, sec. 5, provides that the amendments to this statute in 2012 Ky. Acts ch. 8 shall be cited as “The Dewayne Bunch Act.”

Opinions of Attorney General.

The deadline for filing petitions and certificates
of nomination to fill a vacancy is ten (10) days prior to the special election
and, in computing the deadline, days excluded by KRS

446.030

are not included
in the computation.

OAG 74-751

.

Research References and Practice Aids

ALR

Petition for special election, nonregistration as
affecting one’s qualification as signer of. 100 A.L.R. 1308.

118.775.
Person elected to fill vacancy to take office immediately upon certification of results and administration of oath — Determination by house of General Assembly.

A successful candidate in a special election held for the purpose of filling a vacancy in any elective office shall take office immediately upon certification of the election results by the State Board of Elections or the county board of elections in which the special election was held, administration of the oath of office, and if the successful candidate was a candidate for the General Assembly, upon being determined to be a member by the house in which membership is sought.

History.

Enact. Acts 1990, ch. 48, § 50, effective July 13, 1990; 2010, ch. 123, § 8, effective July 15, 2010; 2021 ch. 197, § 81, effective June 29, 2021.

118.780.
Absent
voting by disabled person. [Repealed.]

118.790.
Application
for absent ballot. [Repealed.]